Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1749.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 33, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-3313, to read: START_STATUTE13-3313. Raffles; real property Notwithstanding any other law, a person or an entity that is authorized to conduct a raffle pursuant to this chapter may conduct a raffle for real property that is owned by the person or the entity. END_STATUTE